Arkansas, session 2025, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-15-1004(a), establishing quality
standards for accreditation of facilities for mammography, is amended to read
as follows:
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall establish
quality standards for accreditation of facilities wherein mammography may be
conducted in accordance with according to the Mammography Quality Standards
Act of 1992, Pub. L. No. 102-539 (21 C.F.R. Part 900).
(2) The standards applicable to the physician who interprets
mammograms shall not be more stringent than those standards listed in the
Mammography Quality Standards Act of 1992, Pub. L. No. 102-539 (21 C.F.R.
Part 900).
*ANS222*
04-07-2025 11:18:06 ANS222

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 S4/7/25 HB1429
(3)(A) An interpreting physician is not required to be on site
but shall be immediately available via telecommunication to interpret
diagnostic mammography to adhere to the quality standard requirements under
subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(B) A patient shall sign a waiver acknowledging that a
diagnostic evaluation performed via telemedicine or remotely may have
limitations compared to an in-person diagnostic evaluation.
(C) The results of the diagnostic evaluation shall be
provided to the patient before the patient leaves the facility after the
completion of the diagnostic evaluation.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Rule modification.
(a) The Department of Health shall modify all rules relating to
performing diagnostic mammography services and the accreditation of
facilities in which diagnostic mammography may be conducted to allow
interpreting physicians to be immediately available via telecommunication.
(b) The department shall remove a requirement to have the interpreting
physician physically on site for the performance of diagnostic mammography
services.
/s/M. Shepherd
















04-07-2025 11:18:06 ANS222